Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144A.43, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Occupational therapist. "Occupational therapist" deleted text begin means a person who is licensed under sections 148.6401 to 148.6449deleted text end new text begin has the meaning given in section 148.6402, subdivision 14new text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144G.08, subdivision 45, is amended to read: Subd. 45. Occupational therapist. "Occupational therapist" deleted text begin means a person who is licensed under sections 148.6401 to 148.6449deleted text end new text begin has the meaning given in section 148.6402, subdivision 14new text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6401, is amended to read: 148.6401 SCOPE. Sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end apply to persons who are applicants for licensure, who are licensed, who use protected titles, or who represent that they are licensed as deleted text begin occupational therapists ordeleted text end occupational therapy deleted text begin assistantsdeleted text end new text begin practitionersnew text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Scope. For the purpose of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end , the following terms have the meanings given them. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education or ACOTE. new text end new text begin "Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education" or "ACOTE" means the entity that accredits occupational therapy education programs in the United States and its territories and establishes, approves, and administers educational standards ensuring consistency across all occupational therapy education. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Continuing competence. new text end new text begin "Continuing competence" means the process in which an occupational therapy practitioner develops and maintains the knowledge, critical reasoning, interpersonal skills, performance skills, and ethical practice necessary to perform their occupational therapy responsibilities. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. deleted text begin Credentialingdeleted text end new text begin Certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapist. "deleted text begin Credentialingdeleted text end new text begin Certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapist" means the examination sponsored by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy for deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end as deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a registerednew text end occupational therapistdeleted text begin , registereddeleted text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. deleted text begin Credentialingdeleted text end new text begin Certification new text end examination for occupational therapy assistant. "deleted text begin Credentialingdeleted text end new text begin Certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapy assistant" means the examination sponsored by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy for deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end as a certified occupational therapy assistant. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12a. new text end new text begin Face-to-face supervision. new text end new text begin "Face-to-face supervision" means supervision occurring between a supervisor and a supervisee within each other's sight or presence. Face-to-face supervision includes real time audio and video communication where the supervisor and supervisee can see each other and clearly visualize the services being provided. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Licensed health care professional. "Licensed health care professional" means a person licensed in good standing in Minnesota to practice medicine, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic, podiatry, advanced practice registered nursing, deleted text begin ordeleted text end dentistry, or deleted text begin is a person registereddeleted text end as anew text begin licensednew text end physician assistant in Minnesota. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13a. new text end new text begin National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy or NBCOT. new text end new text begin "National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy" or "NBCOT" means the entity that administers the certification examination and provides initial and renewal board certification for occupational therapy practitioners providing services in the United States, or any successor entity performing the certification examination and initial and renewal board certification. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Occupational therapist. "Occupational therapist" means an individual deleted text begin who meets the qualifications in sections 148.6401 to 148.6449 and is licensed by the boarddeleted text end new text begin licensed to practice occupational therapy under sections 148.6401 to 148.645 who is responsible for and directs the evaluation process, discharge planning process, development of intervention plans, and provision of occupational therapy servicesnew text end . Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Occupational therapy assistant. "Occupational therapy assistant" means an individual deleted text begin who meets the qualifications for an occupational therapy assistant in sections 148.6401 to 148.6449 and is licensed by the boarddeleted text end new text begin licensed to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under sections 148.6401 to 148.645 who works under the appropriate supervision of and in partnership with an occupational therapist, unless exempted under section 148.6432new text end . Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 16a, is amended to read: Subd. 16a. Occupational therapy practitioner. "Occupational therapy practitioner" means any individual licensed as either an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. License or licensed. "License" or "licensed" means the act or status of a natural person who meets the requirements of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Licensee. "Licensee" means a person who meets the requirements of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 23, is amended to read: Subd. 23. Service competency. (a) "Service competency" of an occupational therapy assistant in performing evaluation tasks means the ability of an occupational therapy assistant to obtain the same information as the supervising occupational therapist when evaluating a client's function. (b) "Service competency" of an occupational therapy assistant in performing treatment procedures means the ability of an occupational therapy assistant to perform treatment procedures in a manner such that the outcome, documentation, and follow-up are equivalent to that which would have been achieved had the supervising occupational therapist performed the treatment procedure. (c) "Service competency" of an occupational therapist means the ability of an occupational therapist to consistently perform an assessment task or intervention procedure with the level of skill recognized as satisfactory within the deleted text begin appropriate acceptable prevailing practicedeleted text end new text begin national practice standards new text end of occupational therapy. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6402, subdivision 25, is amended to read: Subd. 25. Temporary licensure. "Temporary licensure" means a method of licensure described in section 148.6418, by which an individual who (1) has completed an approved or accredited education program but has not met the examination requirement; or (2) possesses a credential from another jurisdiction or the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy but who has not submitted the documentation required by section 148.6420deleted text begin , subdivisions 3 and 4,deleted text end may qualify for Minnesota licensure for a limited time period. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6403, is amended to read: 148.6403 LICENSURE; PROTECTED TITLES AND RESTRICTIONS ON USE; EXEMPT PERSONS; SANCTIONS. Subdivision 1. Unlicensed practice prohibited. A person must not engage in the practice of occupational therapy unless the person is licensed as an occupational therapy practitioner in accordance with sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Subd. 2. Protected titles and restrictions on use. Use of the phrase "occupational therapynew text begin ,new text end " deleted text begin ordeleted text end "occupational therapist," new text begin or "occupational therapy assistant," new text end or the initials "OT"new text begin or "OTA"new text end alone or in combination with any other words or initials to form an occupational title, or to indicate or imply that the person is licensed by the state as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, is prohibited unless that person is licensed under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Subd. 3. Use of "Minnesota licensed." Use of the term "Minnesota licensed" in conjunction with titles protected under this section by any person is prohibited unless that person is licensed under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Subd. 4. Persons licensed or certified in other states. A person who is licensed in Minnesota and licensed or certified in another state may use the designation "licensed" or "certified" with a protected title only if the deleted text begin statedeleted text end new text begin jurisdictionnew text end of licensure or certification is clearly indicated. Subd. 5. Exempt persons. This section does not apply to: (1) a person employed as an occupational therapy practitioner by the government of the United States or any agency of it. However, use of the protected titles under those circumstances is allowed only in connection with performance of official duties for the federal government; (2) a student participating in supervised fieldwork or supervised coursework that is necessary to meet the requirements of section 148.6408, subdivision 1, or 148.6410, subdivision 1, if the person is designated by a title which clearly indicates the person's status as a student trainee. Any use of the protected titles under these circumstances is allowed only while the person is performing the duties of the supervised fieldwork or supervised coursework; deleted text begin ordeleted text end deleted text begin (3) a person visiting and then leaving the state and performing occupational therapy services while in the state, if the services are performed no more than 30 days in a calendar year as part of a professional activity that is limited in scope and duration and is in association with an occupational therapist licensed under sections 148.6401 to 148.6449, and deleted text end deleted text begin (i) thedeleted text end new text begin (3) anew text end person new text begin who new text end is credentialed under the law of another state deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end has credentialing requirements at least as stringent as the requirements of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; or deleted text begin (ii) thedeleted text end new text begin (4) anew text end personnew text begin whonew text end meets the requirements for certification as an occupational therapist registered (OTR) or a certified occupational therapy assistant (COTA), established by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (5) an occupational therapy practitioner who possesses an active compact privilege under section 148.645. new text end Subd. 6. Sanctions. A person who practices occupational therapy or holds out as an occupational therapy practitioner by or through the use of any title described in subdivision 2 without prior licensure according to sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end is subject to sanctions or action against continuing the activity according to section 148.6448, chapter 214, or other statutory authority. Subd. 7. Exemption. Nothing in sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end shall prohibit the practice of any profession or occupation licensed or registered by the state by any person duly licensed or registered to practice the profession or occupation or to perform any act that falls within the scope of practice of the profession or occupation. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6404, is amended to read: 148.6404 SCOPE OF PRACTICE. (a) The practice of occupational therapy means the therapeutic use of everyday deleted text begin activitiesdeleted text end new text begin life occupations new text end with individuals deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end groupsnew text begin , or populationsnew text end for the purpose of enhancing or enabling participationnew text begin in those occupationsnew text end . deleted text begin It is the promotion ofdeleted text end new text begin The practice of occupational therapy promotesnew text end health and well-being through the use of occupational therapy services that includes screening, evaluation, intervention, and consultation to develop, recover, and maintain a client's: (1) sensory integrative, neuromuscular, motor, emotional, motivational, cognitive, or psychosocial components of performance; (2) daily living skills; (3) feeding and swallowing skills; (4) play and leisure skills; (5) educational participation skills; (6) functional performance and work participation skills; (7) community mobility; and (8) health and wellness. (b) Occupational therapy services include but are not limited to: (1) designing, fabricating, or applying rehabilitative technology, such as selected orthotic and prosthetic devices, and providing training in the functional use of these devices; (2) designing, fabricating, or adapting assistive technology and providing training in the functional use of assistive devices; (3) adapting environments using assistive technology such as environmental controls, wheelchair modifications, and positioning; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) deleted text begin employingdeleted text end new text begin applyingnew text end physical agentnew text begin , manual, and mechanicalnew text end modalities in preparation for or as an adjunct to purposeful activity to meet established functional occupational therapy goalsnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) educating and training individuals including family, caregivers, groups, and populationsnew text end . (c) Occupational therapy services must be based on nationally established standards of practice. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6405, is amended to read: 148.6405 LICENSURE APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS: PROCEDURES AND QUALIFICATIONS. (a) An applicant for licensure must comply with the application requirements in section 148.6420. To qualify for licensure, an applicant must satisfy one of the requirements in deleted text begin paragraphs (b) to (f)deleted text end new text begin section 148.6408 to 148.6415, or 148.645new text end and not be subject to denial of licensure under section 148.6448. deleted text begin (b) A person who applies for licensure as an occupational therapist and who has not been credentialed by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy or another jurisdiction must meet the requirements in section 148.6408. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) A person who applies for licensure as an occupational therapy assistant and who has not been credentialed by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy or another jurisdiction must meet the requirements in section 148.6410. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) A person who is certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy may apply for licensure by equivalency and must meet the requirements in section 148.6412. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) A person who is credentialed in another jurisdiction and who was previously certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy may apply for licensure by reciprocity and must meet the requirements in section 148.6415. deleted text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end A person who applies for temporary licensure must meet the requirements in section 148.6418. new text begin (c) A person who applies for licensure under section 148.6408 or 148.6410 more than two years after the person's initial NBCOT certification was issued and who has not practiced in any jurisdiction must submit: new text end new text begin (1) a completed and signed application for licensure on forms provided by the board that meet the requirements of section 148.6420, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2); and new text end new text begin (2) proof of a minimum of 24 continuing education contact hours by an occupational therapist applicant, or a minimum of 18 hours by an occupational therapy assistant applicant, completed within the two years proceeding the application and meeting the requirements of section 148.6443. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A person who applies for licensure under deleted text begin paragraph (b), (c), or (f) more than two and less than four years after meeting the examination requirements in section 148.6408, subdivision 2, or 148.6410, subdivision 2,deleted text end new text begin section 148.6408 or 148.6410 after the person's initial NBCOT certification has expirednew text end must submit deleted text begin the followingdeleted text end : (1) a completed and signed application for licensure on forms provided by the boardnew text begin that meet the requirements of section 148.6420, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2)new text end ;new text begin andnew text end (2) deleted text begin the license application fee required under section 148.6445;deleted text end new text begin evidence of: new text end new text begin (i) completion of an occupational therapy refresher program that contains both theoretical and clinical components completed within the last year; or new text end new text begin (ii) current NBCOT certification. new text end deleted text begin (3) if applying for occupational therapist licensure, proof of having met a minimum of 24 contact hours of continuing education in the two years preceding licensure application, or if applying for occupational therapy assistant licensure, proof of having met a minimum of 18 contact hours of continuing education in the two years preceding licensure application; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) verified documentation of successful completion of 160 hours of supervised practice approved by the board under a limited license specified in section 148.6425, subdivision 3, paragraph (c); and deleted text end deleted text begin (5) additional information as requested by the board to clarify information in the application, including information to determine whether the individual has engaged in conduct warranting disciplinary action under section 148.6448. The information must be submitted within 30 calendar days from the date of the board's request. deleted text end deleted text begin (h) A person who applies for licensure under paragraph (b), (c), or (f) four years or more after meeting the examination requirements in section 148.6408, subdivision 2, or 148.6410, subdivision 2, must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) meet all the requirements in paragraph (g) except clauses (3) and (4); deleted text end deleted text begin (2) submit documentation of having retaken and achieved a qualifying score on the credentialing examination for occupational therapists or occupational therapy assistants, or of having completed an occupational therapy refresher program that contains both a theoretical and clinical component approved by the board; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) submit verified documentation of successful completion of 480 hours of supervised practice approved by the board under a limited license specified in section 148.6425, subdivision 3, paragraph (c). The 480 hours of supervised practice must be completed in six months and may be completed at the applicant's place of work. Only refresher courses completed within one year prior to the date of application qualify for approval. deleted text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6408, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin To be licensed as an occupational therapist, an applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) satisfy the education and examination requirements of subdivisions 1b and 2; or new text end new text begin (2) satisfy the requirements for licensure by equivalency under section 148.6412 or licensure by reciprocity under section 148.6415 as applicable based on the current status of the applicant's NBCOT certification. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6408, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Qualifying examination score required. (a) An applicant must achieve a qualifying score on the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapist. (b) The board shall determine the qualifying score for the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapistdeleted text begin . In determining the qualifying score, the board shall consider the cut scoredeleted text end new text begin as new text end recommended by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, or other national deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end organization approved by the boarddeleted text begin , using the modified Angoff method for determining cut score or another method for determining cut score that is recognized as appropriate and acceptable by industry standardsdeleted text end . (c) deleted text begin The applicant is responsible fordeleted text end new text begin Applicants for licensure mustnew text end : (1) deleted text begin makingdeleted text end new text begin makenew text end arrangements to take the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for new text begin an new text end occupational therapist; (2) deleted text begin bearingdeleted text end new text begin bearnew text end all expenses associated with taking the examination; and (3) deleted text begin having the examination scores sent directly to the board from the testing service that administers the examinationdeleted text end new text begin submit an application and other materials as required by the board under section 148.6420new text end . Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6410, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin To be licensed as an occupational therapist, an applicant must: new text end new text begin (1) satisfy the education and examination requirements of subdivisions 1b and 2; or new text end new text begin (2) satisfy the requirements for licensure by equivalency under section 148.6412 or licensure by reciprocity under section 148.6415 as applicable based on the current status of the applicant's NBCOT certification. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6410, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Qualifying examination score required. (a) An applicant for licensure must achieve a qualifying score on the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapy assistants. (b) The board shall determine the qualifying score for the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapy assistantsdeleted text begin . In determining the qualifying score, the board shall consider the cut scoredeleted text end new text begin asnew text end recommended by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, or other national deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end organization approved by the boarddeleted text begin , using the modified Angoff method for determining cut score or another method for determining cut score that is recognized as appropriate and acceptable by industry standardsdeleted text end . (c) deleted text begin The applicant is responsible fordeleted text end new text begin Applicants for licensure mustnew text end : (1) deleted text begin makingdeleted text end new text begin makenew text end all arrangements to take the deleted text begin credentialingdeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end examination for occupational therapy assistants; (2) deleted text begin bearingdeleted text end new text begin bearnew text end all expense associated with taking the examination; and (3) deleted text begin having the examination scores sent directly to the board from the testing service that administers the examinationdeleted text end new text begin submit an application and other materials as required by the board under section 148.6420new text end . Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6412, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Persons new text begin currently new text end certified by deleted text begin National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapydeleted text end new text begin NBCOTnew text end . The board may license any person deleted text begin certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapydeleted text end new text begin who holds current NBCOT certificationnew text end as an occupational deleted text begin therapist if the board determines the requirements for certification are equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure as an occupational therapist under section 148.6408deleted text end new text begin therapy practitionernew text end . deleted text begin The board may license any person certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy as an occupational therapy assistant if the board determines the requirements for certification are equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure as an occupational therapy assistant under section 148.6410.deleted text end Nothing in this section limits the board's authority to deny licensure based upon the grounds for discipline in sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6412, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Application procedures. Applicants for licensure by equivalency must providedeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end the application materials as required by section 148.6420, deleted text begin subdivisionsdeleted text end new text begin subdivisionnew text end 1deleted text begin , 3, and 4deleted text end deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) the fees required by section 148.6445. deleted text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6415, is amended to read: 148.6415 LICENSURE BY RECIPROCITY. deleted text begin A person who is not certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapydeleted text end new text begin The board may license any person who does not hold current NBCOT certificationnew text end but who holds a new text begin compact privilege or a new text end current credential as an occupational deleted text begin therapistdeleted text end new text begin therapy practitionernew text end in the District of Columbia or a state or territory of the United States whose standards for credentialing are determined by the board to be equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure under section 148.6408 deleted text begin may be eligible for licensure by reciprocity as an occupational therapist. A person who is not certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy but who holds a current credential as an occupational therapy assistant in the District of Columbia or a state or territory of the United States whose standards for credentialing are determined by the board to be equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure under section 148.6410 may be eligible for licensure by reciprocity as an occupational therapy assistant.deleted text end new text begin or 148.6410 as an occupational therapy practitioner.new text end Nothing in this section limits the board's authority to deny licensure based upon the grounds for discipline in sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . An applicant must provide: (1) the application materials as required by section 148.6420, deleted text begin subdivisionsdeleted text end new text begin subdivisionnew text end 1deleted text begin , 3, and 4deleted text end ;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (2) the fees required by section 148.6445; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) a copy of a current and unrestricted credential for the practice of occupational therapy as either an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) a letter from the jurisdiction that issued the credential describing the applicant's qualifications that entitled the applicant to receive the credential; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end other information necessary to determine whether the credentialing standards of the jurisdiction that issued the credential are equivalent to or exceed the requirements for licensure under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6418, is amended to read: 148.6418 TEMPORARY LICENSURE. Subdivision 1. Application. The board shall issue temporary licensure as an occupational deleted text begin therapist or occupationaldeleted text end therapy deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin practitionernew text end to applicants who are not the subject of a disciplinary action or past disciplinary action, nor disqualified on the basis of items listed in section 148.6448, subdivision 1. Subd. 2. Procedures. To be eligible for temporary licensure, an applicant must submit a completed application for temporary licensure on forms provided by the board, the fees required by section 148.6445, and one of the following: (1) evidence of successful completion of the requirements in section 148.6408, subdivision 1, or 148.6410, subdivision 1; (2) a copy of a current and unrestricted credential for the practice of occupational therapy as deleted text begin eitherdeleted text end an occupational deleted text begin therapist or occupationaldeleted text end therapy deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin practitionernew text end in another jurisdiction; or (3) a copy of a current and unrestricted deleted text begin certificatedeleted text end new text begin certificationnew text end from the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy stating that the applicant is certified as an occupational deleted text begin therapist or occupationaldeleted text end therapy deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin practitionernew text end . Subd. 3. Additional documentation. Persons who are deleted text begin credentialeddeleted text end new text begin certifiednew text end by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy ornew text begin credentialed bynew text end another jurisdiction must provide deleted text begin an affidavitdeleted text end new text begin a statementnew text end with the application for temporary licensure stating that they are not the subject of a pending investigation or disciplinary action and have not been the subject of a disciplinary action in the past. Subd. 4. Supervision required. An applicant who has graduated from an accredited occupational therapy program, as required by section 148.6408, subdivision 1, or 148.6410, subdivision 1, and who has not passed the examination required by section 148.6408, subdivision 2, or 148.6410, subdivision 2, must practice under the supervision of a licensed occupational therapist. The supervising therapist must, at a minimum, supervise the person working under temporary licensure in the performance of the initial evaluation, determination of the appropriate intervention plan, and periodic review and modification of the intervention plan. The supervising therapist must observe the person working under temporary licensure in order to ensure service competency in carrying out evaluation, intervention planning, and intervention implementation. The frequency of face-to-face collaboration between the person working under temporary licensure and the supervising therapist must be based on the condition of each patient or client, the complexity of intervention and evaluation procedures, and the proficiencies of the person practicing under temporary licensure. Following demonstrated service competency of the applicant, supervision must occur no less than every ten intervention days or every 30 calendar days, whichever occurs first. The occupational deleted text begin therapist or occupationaldeleted text end therapy deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin practitionernew text end working under temporary licensure must provide verification of supervision on the application form provided by the board.new text begin Supervising occupational therapists must have a minimum of six months of fully licensed practice to supervise a temporary licensee. The occupational therapy practitioner working under temporary licensure must notify the board before changing supervision.new text end Subd. 5. Qualifying examination requirement; expiration and renewability. (a) A person issued a temporary license pursuant to subdivision 2, clause (1), must demonstrate to the board within the temporary licensure period successful completion of the qualifying examination requirement under section 148.6408, subdivision 2, or section 148.6410, subdivision 2. A temporary license holder who fails the qualifying examination for a second time shall have their temporary license revoked effective upon notification to the temporary license holder of the examination score. It is the temporary license holder's obligation to submit to the board their qualifying examination scores and to refrain from practice if their temporary license is revoked. Failure to do so subjects the temporary license holder to disciplinary action pursuant to section 148.6448, subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end .new text begin The board must not issue a temporary license to a person with two or more certification examination failures.new text end (b) A temporary license expires six months from the date of issuance or on the date the board grants or denies licensure, whichever occurs first. (c) A temporary license is not renewable. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6420, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applications for new text begin initial new text end licensure. new text begin (a) new text end An applicant for new text begin initial new text end licensure must: (1) submit a completed application for licensure on forms provided by the board and must supply deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin allnew text end information new text begin and documentation new text end requested on the application, including: (i) the applicant's name, business address and business telephone number, deleted text begin business setting,deleted text end primary email address, and deleted text begin daytimedeleted text end new text begin home or mobilenew text end telephone number; deleted text begin (ii) the name and location of the occupational therapy program the applicant completed; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end a description of the applicant's education and training, including new text begin the name and location of the occupational therapy program the applicant completed and new text end a list of deleted text begin degrees received fromdeleted text end new text begin all othernew text end educational institutionsnew text begin attendednew text end ; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end the applicant's work history for the six years preceding the application; deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end a list of all credentials currently and previously held in Minnesota and other jurisdictions; deleted text begin (vi)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end a description of any jurisdiction's refusal to credential the applicant; deleted text begin (vii)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end a description of all professional disciplinary actions initiated against the applicant in any jurisdiction; deleted text begin (viii)deleted text end new text begin (vii)new text end information on any physical or mental condition or substance use disorder that impairs the person's ability to engage in the practice of occupational therapy with reasonable judgment or safety; deleted text begin (ix)deleted text end new text begin (viii)new text end a description of any misdemeanor or felony deleted text begin conviction that relates to honesty or to the practice of occupational therapydeleted text end new text begin charges or convictionsnew text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (x)deleted text end new text begin (ix)new text end a description of any state or federal court order, including a conciliation court judgment or a disciplinary order, related to the individual's occupational therapy practice; deleted text begin (2) submit with the application all fees required by section 148.6445; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) sign a statement that the information in the application is true and correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) sign a waiver authorizing the board to obtain access to the applicant's records in this or any other state in which the applicant holds or previously held a credential for the practice of an occupation, has completed an accredited occupational therapy education program, or engaged in the practice of occupational therapy; deleted text end new text begin (x) any legal information required under chapter 214; new text end new text begin (xi) either documentation to demonstrate the completion of the required education and examination requirements under section 148.6408, subdivisions 1b and 2, or 148.6410, subdivisions 1b and 2; for applicants for licensure by equivalency under section 148.6412, documentation of current NBCOT certification; or for applicants for licensure by reciprocity under section 148.6415, documentation submitted directly by the appropriate commission or government body verifying the license or credential, or verification from the Compact Commission of the applicant's practice status in Compact Commission states; new text end new text begin (xii) all application fees required by section 148.6445; new text end new text begin (xiii) evidence of completing a criminal background check according to section 214.075; and new text end new text begin (xiv) a signed statement affirming that the information in the application is true and correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief; new text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (2) new text end submit additional information as requested by the board; and deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end submit deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anynew text end additional information required for licensure by equivalency, licensure by reciprocity,new text begin licensure by compact privilege,new text end and temporary licensure as specified in sections 148.6408 to 148.6418deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin and 148.645. An applicant applying under section 148.6418 is exempt from providing documentation related to a criminal background check under clause (1), item (xiii). An applicant applying under section 148.6418, subdivision 4, is exempt from providing documentation related to previously held licenses or credentials under clause (1), item (iv).new text end new text begin (b) The board must not verify the status of an applicant under paragraph (a), clause (1), item (xi), by using another jurisdiction's publicly available website unless the other jurisdiction fails to provide the requested documentation after the applicant provides documentation of making the request. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6423, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Renewal requirements. To be eligible for licensure renewal, a licensee must: (1) submit a completed and signed application for licensure renewaldeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin on forms provided by the board, including:new text end new text begin (i) updated personal information, including the renewal applicant's name, business address and business telephone number, primary email address, and home or mobile telephone number; new text end new text begin (ii) information regarding any change to the renewal applicant's responses to section 148.6420, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), items (v) to (ix); new text end new text begin (iii) a signed statement affirming that the information in the renewal application is true and correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief; and new text end new text begin (iv) any legal information required under chapter 214; new text end (2) submit the renewal fee required under section 148.6445; (3) new text begin if audited, new text end submit proof of having met the continuing education requirement of section 148.6443; and (4) submit additional information as requested by the board to clarify information presented in the renewal application. The information must be submitted within 30 calendar days of the board's request. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6423, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin License period. new text end new text begin Following the initial license period, a license period begins on the first day of the month after the licensee's birth month and must be renewed biennially. new text end Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6423, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Renewal deadline. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c), licenses must be renewed every two yearsnew text begin on or before the first day of the month after the licensee's birth monthnew text end . Licensees must comply with the following procedures in paragraphs (b) to (e). (b) Each license must state an expiration date. An application for licensure renewal must be received by the board deleted text begin at least 30 calendar daysdeleted text end new text begin on ornew text end before the expiration date. (c) If the board changes the renewal schedule and the expiration date is less than two years, the fee and the continuing education contact hours to be reported at the next renewal must be prorated. (d) An application for licensure renewal not received within the time required under paragraph (b)deleted text begin , but received on or before the expiration date,deleted text end must be accompanied by a late fee in addition to the renewal fee specified by section 148.6445. (e) Licensure renewals received after the expiration date must comply with the requirements of section 148.6425. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6425, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Licensure renewalnew text begin within one yearnew text end after licensure expiration date. A licensee whose application for licensure renewal is received after the licensure expiration date new text begin but within one year of the expiration date new text end must submit the following: (1) a completed and signed new text begin renewal new text end application for licensure following lapse in licensed statusdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin on forms provided by the board, including:new text end new text begin (i) updated personal information, including the renewal applicant's name, business address and business telephone number, primary email address, and home or mobile telephone number; new text end new text begin (ii) information regarding any change to the renewal applicant's responses to section 148.6420, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), items (v) to (ix); new text end new text begin (iii) a signed statement affirming that the information in the renewal application is true and correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief; new text end new text begin (iv) information regarding any change to the renewal applicant's responses to section 148.6420, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), item (xi); new text end new text begin (v) NBCOT verification of certification documentation; and new text end new text begin (vi) any legal information required under chapter 214; new text end (2) the renewal fee and the late fee required under section 148.6445; (3) proof of having met the continuing education requirements in section 148.6443deleted text begin , subdivision 1deleted text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) an employment verification form; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end additional information as requested by the board to clarify information in the application, including information to determine whether the licensee has engaged in conduct warranting disciplinary action as set forth in section 148.6448. The information must be submitted within 30 calendar days from the date of the board's request. Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6425, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Licensure renewal within two years after license expiration date. new text end new text begin A licensee whose application for license renewal is received more than one year but less than two years after the expiration date must submit the following: new text end new text begin (1) a completed and signed renewal application for licensure following lapse in licensed status on forms provided by the board, including all information listed in subdivision 2, clause (1); new text end new text begin (2) the renewal fee and the late fee required under section 148.6445; new text end new text begin (3) proof of having met the continuing education requirements in section 148.6443; new text end new text begin (4) an employment verification form; new text end new text begin (5) evidence of completion of a criminal background check as required under section 214.075 and the associated fee; and new text end new text begin (6) additional information as requested by the board to clarify information in the application, including information to determine whether the licensee has engaged in conduct warranting disciplinary action as set forth in section 148.6448. The information must be submitted within 30 calendar days from the date of the board's request. new text end Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6425, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration due to nonrenewal after two years. new text end new text begin The board shall not renew, reissue, reinstate, or restore a license that is not subject to a pending review, investigation, or disciplinary action and has not been renewed within one biennial renewal cycle of the license expiration. An individual whose license has expired under this subdivision for nonrenewal must obtain a new license by applying for licensure and fulfilling all requirements then in existence for an initial license to practice occupational therapy in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6428, is amended to read: 148.6428 CHANGE OF CONTACT INFORMATION OR EMPLOYMENT. A licensee who changes a name, primary email address, address, employment, business address, or business telephone number must inform the board of the change deleted text begin of name, primary email address, address, employment, business address, or business telephone numberdeleted text end within 30 calendar days from the effective date of the change. A change in name must be accompanied by a copy of a marriage certificatenew text begin , government-issued identification card, Social Security card,new text end or court order. All notices or other correspondence served on a licensee by the board at the licensee's contact information on file with the board must be considered as having been received by the licensee. Sec. 38. new text begin [148.6431] JURISPRUDENCE EXAMINATION. new text end new text begin The board may require occupational therapy practitioners to take an open-book jurisprudence examination on state laws and rules regarding the practice of occupational therapy and occupational therapy assisting. new text end Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6432, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. If the professional standards identified in deleted text begin section 148.6430deleted text end new text begin subdivision 1anew text end permit an occupational therapist to delegate an evaluation, reevaluation, or treatment procedure, the occupational therapist must provide supervision consistent with this section. Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6432, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Delegation of duties. new text end new text begin (a) The occupational therapist may delegate to an occupational therapy assistant those portions of the client's evaluation, reevaluation, and intervention that, according to prevailing national practice standards, can be performed by an occupational therapy assistant. new text end new text begin (b) The occupational therapist is responsible for all duties delegated to the occupational therapy assistant. new text end new text begin (c) The occupational therapist may not delegate portions of an evaluation or reevaluation of a person whose condition is changing rapidly. new text end Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6432, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Evaluations. The occupational therapist shall determine the frequency of evaluations and reevaluations for each client. The occupational therapy assistant shall inform the occupational therapist of the need for more frequent reevaluation if indicated by the client's condition or response to treatment. Before delegating a portion of a client's evaluation pursuant to deleted text begin section 148.6430deleted text end new text begin subdivision 1anew text end , the occupational therapist shall ensure the service competency of the occupational therapy assistant in performing the evaluation procedure and shall provide supervision consistent with the condition of the patient or client and the complexity of the evaluation procedure. Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6432, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Intervention. (a) The occupational therapist must determine the frequency and manner of supervision of an occupational therapy assistant performing intervention procedures delegated pursuant to deleted text begin section 148.6430deleted text end new text begin subdivision 1anew text end based on the condition of the patient or client, the complexity of the intervention procedure, and the service competency of the occupational therapy assistant. (b) Face-to-face collaboration between the occupational therapist and the occupational therapy assistant must occurnew text begin for all clientsnew text end every ten intervention days or every 30 days, whichever comes first, during which time the occupational therapist is responsible for: (1) planning and documenting an initial intervention plan and discharge from interventions; (2) reviewing intervention goals, therapy programs, and client progress; (3) supervising changes in the intervention plan; (4) conducting or observing intervention procedures for selected clients and documenting appropriateness of intervention procedures. Clients must be selected based on the occupational therapy services provided to the client and the role of the occupational therapist and the occupational therapy assistant in those services; and (5) ensuring the service competency of the occupational therapy assistant in performing delegated intervention procedures. (c) Face-to-face collaboration must occur more frequently if necessary to meet the requirements of paragraph (a) or (b). (d) The occupational therapist must document compliance with this subdivision in the client's file or chart. Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6432, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Exception. new text begin (a) new text end The supervision requirements of this section do not apply to an occupational therapy assistant who: (1) works in an activities program; and (2) does not perform occupational therapy services. new text begin (b) new text end The occupational therapy assistant must meet all other applicable requirements of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 44. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6435, is amended to read: 148.6435 COORDINATION OF SERVICES. An occupational therapist must: (1) collect information necessary to ensure that the provision of occupational therapy services are consistent with the client's physical and mental health status. The information required to make this determination may include, but is not limited to, contacting the client's licensed health care professional for health history, current health status, current medications, and precautions; deleted text begin (2) modify or terminate occupational therapy intervention of a client that is not beneficial to the client, not tolerated by the client, or refused by the client, and if intervention was terminated for a medical reason, notify the client's licensed health care professional by correspondence postmarked or delivered to the licensed health care professional within one week of the termination of intervention; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end refer a client to an appropriate health care, social service, or education practitioner if the client's condition requires services not within the occupational therapist's service competency or not within the practice of occupational therapy generallynew text begin , or if the client's acuity warrants alternative carenew text end ; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end participate and cooperate in the coordination of occupational therapy services with other related services, as a member of the professional community serving the client. Sec. 45. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6438, is amended to read: 148.6438 RECIPIENT NOTIFICATION. Subdivision 1. Required notification. new text begin (a) new text end In the absence of a deleted text begin physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistantdeleted text end new text begin licensed health care provider new text end referral or prior authorization, and before providing occupational therapy services for remuneration or expectation of payment from the client, an occupational therapist must provide the following deleted text begin writtendeleted text end notification deleted text begin in all capital letters of 12-point or larger boldface type,deleted text end to new text begin the client, parent, or guardian in a format meeting national accessibility standards and the needs of new text end the client, parent, or guardian: "Your health care provider, insurer, or plan may require a deleted text begin physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistantdeleted text end new text begin licensed health care providernew text end referral or prior authorization and you may be obligated for partial or full payment for occupational therapy services rendered." new text begin (b) new text end Information other than this notification may be included as long as the notification remains conspicuous on the face of the document. deleted text begin A nonwritten disclosure format may be used to satisfy the recipient notification requirement when necessary to accommodate the physical condition of a client or client's guardian.deleted text end Subd. 2. Evidence of recipient notification. The occupational therapist is responsible for providing evidence of compliance with the recipient notification requirement of this sectionnew text begin with documentation of the client, parent, or guardian agreementnew text end . Sec. 46. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Activities qualifying for continuing education contact hours. (a) The activities in this subdivision qualify for continuing education contact hours if they meet all other requirements of this section. (b) A minimum of one-half of the required contact hours must be directly related to occupational therapy practice. The remaining contact hours may be related to occupational therapy practice, the delivery of occupational therapy services, or to the practitioner's current professional role. (c) A licensee may obtain an unlimited number of contact hours in any two-year continuing education period through participation in the following: (1) attendance at educational programs of annual conferences, lectures, panel discussions, workshops, in-service training, seminars, and symposiums; (2) successful completion of college or university courses. The licensee must obtain a grade of at least a "C" or a pass in a pass/fail course in order to receive credit. One college credit equals six continuing education contact hours; or (3) successful completion of deleted text begin home studydeleted text end courses that deleted text begin require the participant to demonstrate the participant's knowledge following completion of the coursedeleted text end new text begin provide documentation that the course was completed and that meet the requirements in subdivision 2new text end . (d) A licensee may obtain a maximum of one-half of the required contact hours in any two-year continuing education period for: (1) teaching continuing education or occupational therapy related courses that meet the requirements of this section. A licensee is entitled to earn a maximum of two contact hours as preparation time for each contact hour of presentation time. Contact hours may be claimed only once for teaching the same course in any two-year continuing education period. A course schedule or brochure must be maintained for audit; (2) supervising occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant students. A licensee may earn one contact hour for every eight hours of student supervision. Licensees must ensure they receive documentation regarding each student supervised and the dates and hours each student was supervised. Contact hours obtained by student supervision must be obtained by supervising students from an occupational therapy education program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) teaching or participating in courses related to leisure activities, recreational activities, or hobbies if the practitioner uses these interventions within the practitioner's current practice or employment; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3) new text end engaging in research activities or outcome studies that are related to the practice of occupational therapy and associated with grants, postgraduate studies, or publications in professional journals or books. (e) A licensee may obtain a maximum of two contact hours in any two-year continuing education period for continuing education activities in the following areas: (1) personal skill topics: career burnout, communication skills, human relations, and similar topics; (2) deleted text begin training that is obtained in conjunction with a licensee's employment, occurs during a licensee's normal workday, and does not include subject matter specific to the fundamentals of occupational therapydeleted text end new text begin basic life support and CPR trainingnew text end ; and (3) participation for a minimum of one year on a professional committee or board. Sec. 47. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Activities not qualifying for continuing education contact hours. Credit must not be granted for the following activities: hospital new text begin patient new text end roundsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end entertainment or recreational activitiesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin volunteering; new text end noneducational association meetingsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and employment orientation sessionsnew text begin and meetings, including but not limited to training required at the beginning of employment, annually, or routinely that is related to the employer's organization requirementsnew text end . Sec. 48. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reporting continuing education contact hours. Each licensee must use the continuing education reporting form to verify meeting the continuing education requirements of this section. The licensee must maintain documentation, including but not limited to a signed certificate, transcript, or similar evidence of participation in an activity. The documentation must include deleted text begin adeleted text end : (1) new text begin the new text end title of the continuing education activity; (2) new text begin a new text end brief description of the continuing education activity prepared by the presenter or sponsor; (3) new text begin the name of the new text end sponsor, presenter, or author; (4) new text begin the new text end location and attendance dates; (5) new text begin the new text end number of contact hours; and (6) new text begin the new text end licensee's name. Sec. 49. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Auditing continuing education reports. (a) The board may audit a percentage of the continuing education reports based on random selection. A licensee shall maintain all documentation required by this section for two years after the last day of the biennial licensure period in which the contact hours were earned. (b) All renewal applications that are received after the expiration date may be subject to a continuing education report audit. (c) Any licensee against whom a complaint is filed may be subject to a continuing education report audit. (d) The licensee shall make the following information available to the board for auditing purposes: (1) a copy of the completed continuing education reporting form for the continuing education reporting period that is the subject of the audit including all supporting documentation required by subdivision 5; (2) documentation of university, college, or vocational school courses by a transcript and a course syllabus, listing in a course bulletin, or equivalent documentation that includes the course title, instructor's name, course dates, number of contact hours, and course content, objectives, or goals; and (3) verification of attendance deleted text begin bydeleted text end new text begin that meets the requirements of subdivision 5 by submittingnew text end : (i) a deleted text begin signature ofdeleted text end new text begin certificate of attendance, or if a certificate is not available, other documentation from new text end the presenter or a designee deleted text begin at the continuing education activity on the continuing education report form or a certificate of attendance with the course name, course date, and licensee's namedeleted text end new text begin submitted directly to the board confirming the requirementsnew text end ;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (ii) a summary or outline of the educational content of an audio or video educational activity to verify the licensee's participation in the activity if a designee is not available to sign the continuing education report form; or deleted text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end verification of self-study programs by a certificate of completion deleted text begin or other documentation indicating that the individual has demonstrated knowledge and has successfully completed the programdeleted text end . Sec. 50. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. deleted text begin Waiverdeleted text end new text begin Deferralnew text end of continuing education requirements. The board may deleted text begin waive ordeleted text end defer all or part of the continuing education requirements of this section if the licensee submits a written request and provides satisfactory evidence to the board of illness, injury, financial hardship, family hardship, or other similar extenuating circumstances that preclude completion of the requirements during the licensure period. The request for a deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end must be in writing, state the circumstances that constitute hardship, state the period of time the licensee wishes to have the continuing education requirement deleted text begin waiveddeleted text end new text begin deferrednew text end , and state the alternative measures that will be taken if a deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end is granted. The board must set forth, in writing, the reasons for granting or denying the deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end . deleted text begin Waiversdeleted text end new text begin Deferralsnew text end granted by the board must specify, in writing, the time limitation and required alternative measures to be taken by the licensee. A request for deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end must be denied if the board finds that the circumstances stated by the licensee do not support a claim of hardship, the requested time period for deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end is unreasonable, the alternative measures proposed by the licensee are not equivalent to the continuing education activity being deleted text begin waiveddeleted text end new text begin deferrednew text end , or the request for deleted text begin waiverdeleted text end new text begin deferralnew text end is not submitted to the board within 60 calendar days of the expiration date. Sec. 51. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6443, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Penalties for noncompliance. The board shall refuse to renew or grant, or shall suspend, condition, limit, or new text begin otherwise new text end qualify the license of any person who the board determines has failed to comply with the continuing education requirements of this section. A licensee may request reconsideration of the board's determination of noncompliance or the penalty imposed under this section by making a written request to the board within 30 calendar days of the date of notification to the applicant. Individuals requesting reconsideration may submit information that the licensee wants considered in the reconsideration. Sec. 52. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6445, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Compact privilege fee. new text end new text begin The fee for interstate licensure compact privilege to practice is $150. new text end Sec. 53. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6445, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Active mailing list. new text end new text begin The fee for the standard active licensee mailing list delivered electronically is $500. new text end Sec. 54. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6448, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grounds for denial of licensure or discipline. The board may deny an application for licensure, may approve licensure with conditions, or may discipline a licensee using any disciplinary actions listed in subdivision 3 on proof that the individual has: (1) intentionally submitted false or misleading information to the board; (2) new text begin obtained a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of material facts;new text end new text begin (3) new text end failed, within 30 days, to provide information in response to a written request by the board; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end performed services of an occupational deleted text begin therapist or occupationaldeleted text end therapy deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin practitionernew text end in an incompetent manner or in a manner that falls below the community standard of carenew text begin or national practice standards of carenew text end ; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end failed to satisfactorily perform occupational therapy services during a period of temporary licensure; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end violated sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end failed to perform services with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety due to the use of alcohol or drugs, or other physical or mental impairment; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end been convicted of violating any state or federal law, rule, or regulation which deleted text begin directlydeleted text end new text begin reasonablynew text end relates to the practice of occupational therapy; new text begin (9) failed to report other licensees that have violated sections 148.6401 to 148.645; new text end deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end aided or abetted another person in violating any provision of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end been disciplined for conduct in the practice of an occupation by the state of Minnesota, another jurisdiction, or a national professional association, if any of the grounds for discipline are the same or substantially equivalent to those in sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end not cooperated with the board in an investigation conducted according to subdivision 2; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end advertised in a manner that is false or misleading; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end engaged in dishonest, unethical, or unprofessional conduct in connection with the practice of occupational therapy that is likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public; new text begin (15) improperly managed client records, including but not limited to failure to maintain client records in a manner that meets community standards of care or nationally accepted practice standards; new text end deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (16) new text end demonstrated a willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare, or safety of a client; new text begin (17) inappropriately supervised or delegated or assigned tasks to an occupational therapy assistant, occupational therapy student, rehabilitation aide, or other licensed professional; new text end deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end performed medical diagnosis or provided intervention, other than occupational therapy, without being licensed to do so under the laws of this state; deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (19)new text end paid or promised to pay a commission or part of a fee to any person who contacts the occupational deleted text begin therapistdeleted text end new text begin therapy practitionernew text end for consultation or sends patients to the occupational deleted text begin therapistdeleted text end new text begin therapy practitionernew text end for intervention; deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (20)new text end engaged in an incentive payment arrangement, other than that prohibited by clause deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (19)new text end , that promotes occupational therapy overutilization, whereby the referring person or person who controls the availability of occupational therapy services to a client profits unreasonably as a result of client intervention; deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (21)new text end engaged in abusive or fraudulent billing practicesdeleted text begin , including violations of federal Medicare and Medicaid laws, Food and Drug Administration regulations, or state medical assistance lawsdeleted text end ; deleted text begin (18)deleted text end new text begin (22)new text end obtained money, property, or services from a consumer through the use of undue influence, high pressure sales tactics, harassment, duress, deception, or fraud; deleted text begin (19)deleted text end new text begin (23)new text end performed services for a client who had no possibility of benefiting from the services; deleted text begin (20)deleted text end new text begin (24)new text end failed to refer a client for medical evaluation when appropriate or when a client indicated symptoms associated with diseases that could be medically or surgically treated; deleted text begin (21)deleted text end new text begin (25)new text end engaged in conduct with a client that is sexual or may reasonably be interpreted by the client as sexual, or in any verbal behavior that is seductive or sexually demeaning to a patient; deleted text begin (22)deleted text end new text begin (26)new text end violated a federal or state court order, including a conciliation court judgment, or a disciplinary order issued by the board, related to the person's occupational therapy practice; or deleted text begin (23)deleted text end new text begin (27) new text end any other just cause related to the practice of occupational therapy. Sec. 55. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6448, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Investigation of complaints. The board may initiate an investigation upon receiving a complaint or other oral or written communication that alleges or implies that a person has violated sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . In the receipt, investigation, and hearing of a complaint that alleges or implies a person has violated sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end , the board must follow the procedures in sections 214.10 and 214.103. Sec. 56. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6448, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Effect of specific disciplinary action on use of title. Upon notice from the board denying licensure renewal or upon notice that disciplinary actions have been imposed and the person is no longer entitled to practice occupational therapy and use the occupational therapy and licensed titles, the person shall cease to practice occupational therapy, to use titles protected by sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end , and to represent to the public that the person is licensed by the board. Sec. 57. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6448, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Authority to contract. The board shall contract with the health professionals services program as authorized by sections 214.31 to 214.37 to provide these services to practitioners under this chapter. The health professionals services program does not affect the board's authority to discipline violations of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Sec. 58. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6449, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Creation. The Board of Occupational Therapy Practice consists of 11 members appointed by the governor. The members are: (1) five occupational therapists licensed under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; (2) three occupational therapy assistants licensed under sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; and (3) three public members, including two members who have received occupational therapy services or have a family member who has received occupational therapy services, and one member who is a health care professional or health care provider licensed in Minnesota. Sec. 59. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6449, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Qualifications of board members. (a) The occupational therapy practitioners appointed to the board must represent a variety of practice areas and settings. (b) At least deleted text begin two occupational therapy practitionersdeleted text end new text begin three members of the boardnew text end must be employed new text begin or reside new text end outside the seven-county metropolitan area. (c) Board members must not serve for more than two full consecutive terms. new text begin (d) Interstate licensure compact privilege holders are not eligible to serve on the board. new text end Sec. 60. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.6449, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Duties of the Board of Occupational Therapy Practice. (a) The board shall: (1) adopt and enforce rules and laws necessary for licensing occupational therapy practitioners; (2) adopt and enforce rules for regulating the professional conduct of the practice of occupational therapy; (3) issue licenses to qualified individuals in accordance with sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; (4) assess and collect fees for the issuance and renewal of licenses; (5) educate the public about the requirements for licensing occupational therapy practitioners, educate occupational therapy practitioners about the rules of conduct, and enable the public to file complaints against applicants and licensees who may have violated sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end ; and (6) investigate individuals engaging in practices that violate sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end and take necessary disciplinary, corrective, or other action according to section 148.6448. (b) The board may adopt rules necessary to define standards or carry out the provisions of sections 148.6401 to deleted text begin 148.6449deleted text end new text begin 148.645new text end . Rules shall be adopted according to chapter 14. Sec. 61. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin (a) The revisor of statutes shall renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 148.6408, subdivision 1, as Minnesota Statutes, section 148.6408, subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (b) The revisor of statutes shall renumber Minnesota Statutes, section 148.6410, subdivision 1, as Minnesota Statutes, section 148.6410, subdivision 1b. new text end Sec. 62. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 148.6402, subdivision 22a; 148.6420, subdivisions 2, 3, and 4; 148.6423, subdivisions 4, 5, 7, 8, and 9; 148.6425, subdivision 3; 148.6430; and 148.6445, subdivisions 5, 6, and 8, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02854 148.6402 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 22a. Limited license. "Limited license" means a license issued according to section 148.6425, subdivision 3, paragraph (c), to persons who for two years or more did not apply for a license after meeting the requirements in section 148.6408 or 148.6410 or who allowed their license to lapse for four years or more. 148.6420 APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. Subd. 2. Persons applying for licensure under section 148.6408 or 148.6410. Persons applying for licensure under section 148.6408 or 148.6410 must submit the materials required in subdivision 1 and the following: (1) a certificate of successful completion of the requirements in section 148.6408, subdivision 1, or 148.6410, subdivision 1; and (2) the applicant's test results from the examining agency, as evidence that the applicant received a qualifying score on a credentialing examination meeting the requirements of section 148.6408, subdivision 2, or 148.6410, subdivision 2. Subd. 3. Applicants certified by National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy. An applicant who is certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy must provide the materials required in subdivision 1 and the following: (1) verified documentation from the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy stating that the applicant is certified as an occupational therapist, registered or certified occupational therapy assistant, the date certification was granted, and the applicant's certification number. The document must also include a statement regarding disciplinary actions. The applicant is responsible for obtaining this documentation by sending a form provided by the board to the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy; and (2) a waiver authorizing the board to obtain access to the applicant's records maintained by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy. Subd. 4. Applicants credentialed in another jurisdiction. In addition to providing the materials required in subdivision 1, an applicant credentialed in another jurisdiction must request that the appropriate government body in each jurisdiction in which the applicant holds or held an occupational therapy credential provide documentation to the board that verifies the applicant's credentials. Except as provided in section 148.6418, a license must not be issued until the board receives verification of each of the applicant's credentials. Each verification must include the applicant's name and date of birth, credential number and date of issuance, a statement regarding investigations pending and disciplinary actions taken or pending against the applicant, current status of the credential, and the terms under which the credential was issued. 148.6423 LICENSURE RENEWAL. Subd. 4. License renewal cycle conversion. The license renewal cycle for occupational therapy licensees is converted to a two-year cycle where renewal is due on the last day of the licensee's month of birth. Conversion pursuant to this section begins January 1, 2021. This section governs license renewal procedures for licensees who were licensed before December 31, 2020. The conversion renewal cycle is the renewal cycle following the first license renewal after January 1, 2020. The conversion license period is the license period for the conversion renewal cycle. The conversion license period is between 13 and 24 months and ends on the last day of the licensee's month of birth in either 2022 or 2023, as described in subdivision 5. Subd. 5. Conversion of license renewal cycle for current licensees. For a licensee whose license is current as of December 31, 2020, the licensee's conversion license period begins on January 1, 2021, and ends on the last day of the licensee's month of birth in 2023, except that for licensees whose month of birth is January, February, March, April, May, or June, the licensee's renewal cycle ends on the last day of the licensee's month of birth in 2022. Subd. 7. Subsequent renewal cycles. After the licensee's conversion renewal cycle under subdivision 5 or 6, subsequent renewal cycles are biennial and begin on the first day of the month following the licensee's birth month. Subd. 8. Conversion period and fees. (a) A licensee who holds a license issued before January 1, 2021, and who renews that license pursuant to subdivision 5 or 6, must pay a renewal fee as required in this subdivision. (b) A licensee must be charged the biennial license fee listed in section 148.6445 for the conversion license period. (c) For a licensee whose conversion license period is 13 to 24 months, the first biennial license fee charged after the conversion license period must be adjusted to credit the excess fee payment made during the conversion license period. The credit is calculated by: (1) subtracting the number of months of the licensee's conversion license period from 24; and (2) multiplying the result of clause (1) by 1/24 of the biennial fee rounded up to the next dollar. (d) For a licensee whose conversion license period is 24 months, the first biennial license fee charged after the conversion license period must not be adjusted. (e) For the second and all subsequent license renewals made after the conversion license period, the licensee's biennial license fee is as listed in section 148.6445. Subd. 9. Expiration. Subdivisions 4, 5, 7, and 8 expire December 31, 2023. 148.6425 RENEWAL OF LICENSURE; AFTER EXPIRATION DATE. Subd. 3. Licensure renewal four years or more after licensure expiration date. (a) An individual who requests licensure renewal four years or more after the licensure expiration date must submit the following: (1) a completed and signed application for licensure on forms provided by the board; (2) the renewal fee and the late fee required under section 148.6445 if renewal application is based on paragraph (b), clause (1), (2), or (3), or the renewal fee required under section 148.6445 if renewal application is based on paragraph (b), clause (4); (3) proof of having met the continuing education requirement in section 148.6443, subdivision 1, except the continuing education must be obtained in the two years immediately preceding application renewal; and (4) at the time of the next licensure renewal, proof of having met the continuing education requirement, which shall be prorated based on the number of months licensed during the two-year licensure period. (b) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (a), the applicant must submit proof of one of the following: (1) verified documentation of successful completion of 160 hours of supervised practice approved by the board as described in paragraph (c); (2) verified documentation of having achieved a qualifying score on the credentialing examination for occupational therapists or the credentialing examination for occupational therapy assistants administered within the past year; (3) documentation of having completed a combination of occupational therapy courses or an occupational therapy refresher program that contains both a theoretical and clinical component approved by the board. Only courses completed within one year preceding the date of the application or one year after the date of the application qualify for approval; or (4) evidence that the applicant holds a current and unrestricted credential for the practice of occupational therapy in another jurisdiction and that the applicant's credential from that jurisdiction has been held in good standing during the period of lapse. (c) To participate in a supervised practice as described in paragraph (b), clause (1), the applicant shall obtain limited licensure. To apply for limited licensure, the applicant shall submit the completed limited licensure application, fees, and agreement for supervision of an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant practicing under limited licensure signed by the supervising therapist and the applicant. The supervising occupational therapist shall state the proposed level of supervision on the supervision agreement form provided by the board. The supervising therapist shall determine the frequency and manner of supervision based on the condition of the patient or client, the complexity of the procedure, and the proficiencies of the supervised occupational therapist. At a minimum, a supervising occupational therapist shall be on the premises at all times that the person practicing under limited licensure is working; be in the room ten percent of the hours worked each week by the person practicing under limited licensure; and provide daily face-to-face collaboration for the purpose of observing service competency of the occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, discussing treatment procedures and each client's response to treatment, and reviewing and modifying, as necessary, each treatment plan. The supervising therapist shall document the supervision provided. The occupational therapist participating in a supervised practice is responsible for obtaining the supervision required under this paragraph and must comply with the board's requirements for supervision during the entire 160 hours of supervised practice. The supervised practice must be completed in two months and may be completed at the applicant's place of work. (d) In addition to the requirements in paragraphs (a) and (b), the applicant must submit additional information as requested by the board to clarify information in the application, including information to determine whether the applicant has engaged in conduct warranting disciplinary action as set forth in section 148.6448. The information must be submitted within 30 days after the board's request. 148.6430 DELEGATION OF DUTIES; ASSIGNMENT OF TASKS. The occupational therapist is responsible for all duties delegated to the occupational therapy assistant or tasks assigned to direct service personnel. The occupational therapist may delegate to an occupational therapy assistant those portions of a client's evaluation, reevaluation, and intervention that, according to prevailing national practice standards, can be performed by an occupational therapy assistant. The occupational therapist may not delegate portions of an evaluation or reevaluation of a person whose condition is changing rapidly. 148.6445 FEES. Subd. 5. Limited licensure fee. The fee for limited licensure is $100. Subd. 6. Fee for course approval after lapse of licensure. The fee for course approval after lapse of licensure is $100. Subd. 8. Verification to institutions. The fee for verification of licensure to institutions is $10.